Arkansas, session 2025, HB1045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
2-1-103. Crop residue burn requirements — Liability — Penalty.
(a) A crop residue burn shall:
(1) Be reported to the Department of Agriculture before burning
commences; and
(2) Comply with the Arkansas Voluntary Smoke Management
Guidelines for Row Crop Burning.
(b) An individual who conducts a crop residue burn in compliance with
this section is not liable in a civil action for any damage or injury caused
by a fire in the crop residue burn, including without limitation the
reignition of a smoldering and previously contained fire or resulting from
*CRH008*
02-19-2025 11:14:42 CRH008

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 HB1045
smoke, unless the claimant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the
claimant suffered damages as a result of negligence by the individual in
planning, implementing, or conducting the crop residue burn.
(c) Information reported to the department under subsection (a) of
this section is not a public record and is exempt from the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act shall be effective on and after
July 1, 2026.

/s/Cavenaugh

























02-19-2025 11:14:42 CRH008